Colorado, session 2026A, SB139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-32-124.7 as
follows:
22-32-124.7. Workforce housing - school district powers and
duties - definitions.
(1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES, THE BOARD
OF EDUCATION MAY:
(a) ACQUIRE, CONSTRUCT, IMPROVE, OWN, OPERATE, LEASE, AND
LEASE-PURCHASE WORKFORCE HOUSING;
(b) ISSUE GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS OR NON-ENTERPRISE
REVENUE BONDS TO PAY THE COSTS OF ACQUIRING, CONSTRUCTING,
IMPROVING, OWNING, OPERATING, LEASING, AND LEASE-PURCHASING
WORKFORCE HOUSING;
-4- SB26-139

(c) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH PUBLIC ENTITIES AND PRIVATE
PARTIES, INCLUDING PUBLIC-PUBLIC AND PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS,
FOR THE ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, IMPROVEMENT, OWNERSHIP,
OPERATION, LEASING, AND LEASE-PURCHASING OF WORKFORCE HOUSING;
AND
(d) CREATE AN ENTERPRISE FOR THE ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION,
IMPROVEMENT, OWNERSHIP, OPERATION, LEASING, AND
LEASE-PURCHASING OF WORKFORCE HOUSING.
(2) (a) AN ENTERPRISE CREATED BY A BOARD OF EDUCATION
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION HAS THE POWERS AND DUTIES DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTIONS (1)(a) AND (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) (A) AN ENTERPRISE CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) MAY ISSUE BONDS TO ACCOMPLISH OR FURTHER ANY OF
ITS POWERS OR DUTIES RELATING TO WORKFORCE HOUSING.
(B) BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) MUST BE ISSUED PURSUANT TO RESOLUTION OF THE
ENTERPRISE'S BOARD, ARE PAYABLE SOLELY FROM ALL OR A SPECIFIED
PORTION OF THE REVENUES OR ASSETS OF THE ENTERPRISE OR THE
REVENUES AND ASSETS OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING COMPONENT OF A
PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP, AND MAY BE SECURED BY A MORTGAGE,
DEED OF TRUST, PLEDGE, OTHER SECURITY INTEREST IN OR ENCUMBRANCE
ON ANY OF THE REVENUE, PROPERTY, OR ASSETS OF THE ENTERPRISE OR
THE REVENUE, PROPERTY, OR ASSETS OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING
COMPONENT OF A PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP.
(C) AS PROVIDED IN THE RESOLUTION OF THE ENTERPRISE UNDER
WHICH BONDS ARE AUTHORIZED TO BE ISSUED OR AS PROVIDED IN A TRUST
INDENTURE BETWEEN THE ENTERPRISE AND ANY COMMERCIAL BANK OR
-5- SB26-139

TRUST COMPANY HAVING FULL TRUST POWERS: BONDS MAY BE EXECUTED
AND DELIVERED BY AN ENTERPRISE CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) AT THE TIMES; MAY BE IN THE FORM AND DENOMINATIONS
AND INCLUDE THE TERMS AND MATURITIES; MAY BE SUBJECT TO OPTIONAL
OR MANDATORY REDEMPTION PRIOR TO MATURITY WITH OR WITHOUT A
PREMIUM; MAY BE IN FULLY REGISTERED FORM OR BEARER FORM
REGISTRABLE AS TO PRINCIPAL OR INTEREST OR BOTH; MAY BE PAYABLE
IN SUCH INSTALLMENTS AND AT THE TIMES NOT EXCEEDING FORTY-FIVE
YEARS FROM THE DATE THEREOF; MAY BE PAYABLE AT THE PLACE
WHETHER WITHIN OR WITHOUT THE STATE OR ELECTRONICALLY; MAY
BEAR FIXED OR VARIABLE INTEREST; MAY BE SUBJECT TO PURCHASE AT
THE OPTION OF THE HOLDER OR THE ENTERPRISE; MAY BE EVIDENCED IN
SUCH MANNER; MAY BE EXECUTED BY THE OFFICERS OF THE ENTERPRISE,
INCLUDING THE USE OF ONE OR MORE FACSIMILE SIGNATURES, WHICH MAY
BE EITHER OF AN OFFICER OF THE ENTERPRISE OR OF AN AGENT
AUTHENTICATING THE SAME; MAY BE IN THE FORM OF COUPON BONDS
THAT HAVE ATTACHED INTEREST COUPONS BEARING A MANUAL OR
FACSIMILE SIGNATURE OF AN OFFICER OF THE ENTERPRISE; AND MAY
CONTAIN THE PROVISIONS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(b).
(D) BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) MAY BE SOLD AT PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SALE AT THE
PRICE OR PRICES, IN THE MANNER, AND AT THE TIMES DETERMINED BY THE
BOARD, AND THE ENTERPRISE SHALL PAY FEES, EXPENSES, AND
COMMISSIONS THAT IT DEEMS NECESSARY OR ADVANTAGEOUS IN
CONNECTION WITH THE SALE OF THE BONDS. THE POWER TO FIX THE DATE
OF SALE OF THE BONDS, TO RECEIVE BIDS OR PROPOSALS, TO AWARD AND
-6- SB26-139

SELL BONDS, TO FIX INTEREST RATES, AND TO TAKE ALL OTHER ACTION
NECESSARY TO SELL AND DELIVER THE BONDS MAY BE DELEGATED TO AN
OFFICER OR AGENT OF THE ENTERPRISE.
(E) ANY OUTSTANDING BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) MAY BE REFUNDED BY THE
ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 56 OF TITLE 11.
(F) ALL BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) AND ANY INTEREST COUPONS APPLICABLE TO THE
BONDS ARE DECLARED TO BE NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENTS.
(G) THE RESOLUTION OR TRUST INDENTURE AUTHORIZING THE
ISSUANCE OF BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) MAY PLEDGE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE REVENUES AND
ASSETS OF THE ENTERPRISE; MAY GRANT OR PROVIDE FOR A MORTGAGE,
DEED OF TRUST, PLEDGE, OTHER SECURITY INTEREST IN OR ENCUMBRANCE
ON ANY OF THE REVENUES, PROPERTY, OR ASSETS OF THE ENTERPRISE;
MAY PLEDGE ALL OR A PORTION OF THE RIGHTS OF THE ENTERPRISE TO
IMPOSE AND RECEIVE RENT OR OTHER CHARGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS PART 1; MAY CONTAIN THE PROVISIONS FOR
PROTECTING AND ENFORCING THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF HOLDERS OF
ANY OF THE BONDS THAT THE ENTERPRISE DEEMS APPROPRIATE; MAY SET
FORTH THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF THE HOLDERS OF ANY OF THE BONDS;
AND MAY CONTAIN PROVISIONS THAT THE ENTERPRISE DEEMS
APPROPRIATE FOR THE SECURITY OF THE HOLDERS OF THE BONDS,
INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR LETTERS OF CREDIT, INSURANCE, STANDBY
CREDIT AGREEMENTS, OR OTHER FORMS OF CREDIT ENSURING TIMELY
PAYMENT OF THE BONDS, INCLUDING THE REDEMPTION PRICE OR THE
PURCHASE PRICE.
-7- SB26-139

(H) ANY PLEDGE OF REVENUE, ASSETS, OR OTHER PROPERTY MADE
BY AN ENTERPRISE CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) OR BY
ANY PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL UNIT WITH WHICH SUCH AN ENTERPRISE
CONTRACTS IS VALID AND BINDING FROM THE TIME THE PLEDGE IS MADE.
THE PLEDGED REVENUES, ASSETS, OR PROPERTY ARE IMMEDIATELY
SUBJECT TO THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE WITHOUT ANY PHYSICAL DELIVERY
OR FURTHER ACT, AND THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE IS VALID AND BINDING
AGAINST ALL PARTIES HAVING CLAIMS OF ANY KIND IN TORT, CONTRACT,
OR OTHERWISE AGAINST THE PLEDGING PARTY. THE LIEN OF THE PLEDGE
IS SUPERIOR TO ANY OTHER LIEN ON THE SAME REVENUE, ASSETS, OR
PROPERTY THAT IS FILED LATER IN TIME OTHER THAN A LIEN FOR
PROPERTY TAXES.
(I) NEITHER THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF AN ENTERPRISE
CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), EMPLOYEES OF THE
ENTERPRISE, IF ANY, NOR ANY PERSON EXECUTING BONDS PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) ARE LIABLE PERSONALLY ON THE BONDS OR
SUBJECT TO ANY PERSONAL LIABILITY BY REASON OF THE ISSUANCE OF THE
BONDS.
(J) AN ENTERPRISE CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)
MAY PURCHASE BONDS THAT IT ISSUES PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(b) OUT OF ANY AVAILABLE MONEY AND MAY HOLD, PLEDGE, CANCEL,
OR RESELL THE BONDS SUBJECT TO AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
AGREEMENTS WITH THE HOLDERS OF THE BONDS.
(II) AN ENTERPRISE CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)
MAY INVEST OR DEPOSIT ANY PROCEEDS AND ANY INTEREST FROM THE
SALE OF BONDS PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) IN THE MANNER
PROVIDED BY PART 6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF TITLE 24. IN ADDITION, AN
-8- SB26-139

ENTERPRISE MAY DIRECT A CORPORATE TRUSTEE THAT HOLDS THE
PROCEEDS AND ANY INTEREST TO INVEST OR DEPOSIT THE PROCEEDS AND
ANY INTEREST IN INVESTMENTS OR DEPOSITS OTHER THAN THOSE
SPECIFIED BY SAID PART 6 IF THE ENTERPRISE DETERMINES, BY
RESOLUTION, THAT THE INVESTMENT OR DEPOSIT MEETS THE STANDARD
ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 15-1-304, THE INCOME IS AT LEAST COMPARABLE
TO INCOME AVAILABLE ON INVESTMENTS OR DEPOSITS SPECIFIED BY PART
6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF TITLE 24, AND THE INVESTMENT WILL ASSIST THE
ENTERPRISE IN THE COMPLETION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING OR ACTIVITIES
TO BE FINANCED FROM PROCEEDS OF THE BONDS.
(III) ALL BANKS, TRUST COMPANIES, SAVINGS AND LOAN
ASSOCIATIONS, INSURANCE COMPANIES, EXECUTORS, ADMINISTRATORS,
GUARDIANS, TRUSTEES, AND OTHER FIDUCIARIES MAY LEGALLY INVEST
ANY MONEY WITHIN THEIR CONTROL IN BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b). PUBLIC ENTITIES, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-75-601 (1), MAY INVEST PUBLIC MONEY IN SUCH BONDS ONLY
IF THE BONDS SATISFY THE INVESTMENT REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN
PART 6 OF ARTICLE 75 OF TITLE 24.
(IV) BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) ARE EXEMPT FROM THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE 51 OF
TITLE 11.
(V) BONDS ISSUED BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(b) ARE EXEMPT FROM TAXATION BY THE STATE AND ANY
COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR OTHER POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(VI) THE ISSUANCE OF BONDS BY AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) NEED ONLY COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
-9- SB26-139

THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b).
(3) (a) A SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY ISSUE NON-ENTERPRISE REVENUE
BONDS TO ACCOMPLISH OR FURTHER ANY OF ITS POWERS OR DUTIES
RELATING TO WORKFORCE HOUSING.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3), "NON-ENTERPRISE REVENUE
BONDS" MEANS BONDS THAT ARE ISSUED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR THE
PURPOSE OF FINANCING WORKFORCE HOUSING. NON-ENTERPRISE REVENUE
BONDS:
(I) MUST BE PAYABLE FROM REVENUES DERIVED FROM THE
OWNERSHIP AND OPERATION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING AND MAY BE
SECURED BY A PLEDGE OF OR LIEN ON THOSE REVENUES AND A MORTGAGE
OF SUCH WORKFORCE HOUSING FACILITIES;
(II) MUST BE AUTHORIZED BY THE VOTERS OF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT, IF REQUIRED BY SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION OR ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION;
(III) ARE NOT SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS ON SCHOOL DISTRICT
BONDS ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 22-42-104; AND
(IV) MUST BE ISSUED IN THE SAME MANNER, ARE ENTITLED TO THE
SAME EXEMPTIONS FROM STATE TAXES AND OTHER STATE LAWS
APPLICABLE TO THE ISSUANCE OF SCHOOL DISTRICT GENERAL OBLIGATION
BONDS, AND, EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3),
SHALL BE TREATED THE SAME, AS THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S GENERAL
OBLIGATION BONDS.
(4) A SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL NOT ISSUE EXEMPT FACILITY BONDS,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 142 (a) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; USE
PRIVATE ACTIVITY BONDS VOLUME CAP ALLOCATION IN THE ISSUANCE OF
BONDS; OR RECEIVE A DIRECT ALLOCATION, STATEWIDE BALANCE AWARD,
-10- SB26-139

OR ASSIGNMENT OF ALLOCATION OF STATE CEILING PURSUANT TO PART 17
OF ARTICLE 32 OF TITLE 24.
(5) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ENTERPRISE" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION
24-77-102 (3).
(b) "WORKFORCE HOUSING" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS IN
SECTION 22-43.8-103 (15).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-41-110, amend
(1)(b)(II) and (1)(b)(III); and add (1)(b)(II.5) as follows:
22-41-110. Timely payment of school district obligations.
(1) (b) This section applies to:
(II) Obligations of a school district in connection with a lease
agreement or installment purchase agreement entered into by a school
district under section 22-32-127 or 22-45-103 (1)(c) on or after July 1,
1991, OR A LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT AND THE STATE ENTERED INTO IN CONNECTION WITH A
FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BY THE
STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-108; and
(II.5) REVENUE BONDS ISSUED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-32-124.7 (2) OR NON-ENTERPRISE REVENUE
BONDS ISSUED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-32-124.7
(3) FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING WORKFORCE HOUSING; AND
(III) Refunding bonds issued by a school district pursuant to
article 56 of title 11 OR BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 22-32-124.7 (2).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-43.7-105, add (4)
-11- SB26-139

as follows:
22-43.7-105. Division of public school capital construction
assistance - creation - director - function - powers and duties.
(4) IN ADDITION TO THE FUNCTIONS OF THE DIVISION SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTIONS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE
PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT AS DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE 43.8
OF THIS TITLE 22 OR AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING ASSISTANCE BOARD CREATED IN SECTION 22-43.8-105, IN
PARTNERSHIP WITH THE DIVISION OF HOUSING WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT
OF LOCAL AFFAIRS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 43.8 to
title 22 as follows:
ARTICLE 43.8
Building Excellent Teacher and Employee Residences
22-43.8-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 43.8 IS THE "BUILDING
EXCELLENT TEACHER AND EMPLOYEE RESIDENCES ACT".
22-43.8-102. Legislative findings and declarations.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) COLORADO IS EXPERIENCING A SEVERE AND PERVASIVE
HOUSING AFFORDABILITY CRISIS, WITH RENTS AND HOME PRICES IN MANY
COMMUNITIES RISING FAR FASTER THAN EDUCATOR SALARIES. IN
NUMEROUS COMMUNITIES, THE SHORTAGE OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING HAS
MADE IT DIFFICULT OR IMPOSSIBLE FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL
DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF TO LIVE IN THE COMMUNITIES THEY
SERVE. THIS HOUSING SHORTAGE DIRECTLY CONTRIBUTES TO CHRONIC
STAFFING VACANCIES, HIGH TURNOVER, AND DISRUPTIONS TO STUDENT
-12- SB26-139

LEARNING.
(b) SCHOOL DISTRICTS POSSESS VARYING LEVELS OF FINANCIAL
CAPACITY TO DEVELOP WORKFORCE HOUSING FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER
SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF, AND MANY ARE UNABLE TO
FINANCE SUCH PROJECTS BECAUSE RENTAL INCOME CANNOT SUPPORT THE
FULL COSTS OF DEVELOPMENT IN THE CURRENT INTEREST RATE AND
CONSTRUCTION COST ENVIRONMENT;
(c) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A PROGRAM TO PROVIDE STATE
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING IS NECESSARY TO
ENSURE THAT TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC
SCHOOL STAFF HAVE ACCESS TO SAFE AND ATTAINABLE HOUSING THAT
ALLOWS THEM TO LIVE IN THE COMMUNITIES THEY SERVE, THEREBY
SUPPORTING THE EDUCATIONAL SUCCESS AND WELL-BEING OF
COLORADO'S CHILDREN AND FAMILIES AND THE EFFECTIVE OPERATION OF
PUBLIC SCHOOLS; AND
(d) THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT OF WORKFORCE HOUSING FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER
SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
43.8 SUPPLEMENTS, AND DOES NOT SUPPLANT, OTHER STATE FUNDING FOR
EDUCATION, AND DOES NOT REDUCE ANY STATE OBLIGATIONS UNDER
EXISTING STATUTORY OR COURT-ORDERED EDUCATION FUNDING
REQUIREMENTS.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT OF WORKFORCE HOUSING FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER
SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
43.8 SUPPLEMENTS, AND DOES NOT SUPPLANT, OTHER STATE FUNDING FOR
-13- SB26-139

EDUCATION, AND DOES NOT REDUCE ANY STATE OBLIGATIONS UNDER
EXISTING STATUTORY OR COURT-ORDERED EDUCATION FUNDING
REQUIREMENTS; AND
(b) HOUSING PROJECTS THAT SELECT TENANTS USING A TENANT
SELECTION PROCESS THAT CREATES PREFERENCES FOR TEACHERS AND
OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF AND OTHER PERSONS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 22-47.8-107 (3)(a):
(I) PROMOTE A SUBSTANTIAL, LEGITIMATE, AND
NONDISCRIMINATORY STATE INTEREST THAT CANNOT BE SERVED BY
ANOTHER PRACTICE WITH A LESS DISCRIMINATORY EFFECT;
(II) COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL "FAIR HOUSING ACT", 42 U.S.C.
SEC. 3601 ET SEQ., PART 5 OF ARTICLE 34 OF TITLE 24, AND OTHER STATE
AND LOCAL LAWS, ORDINANCES, AND RESOLUTIONS.
(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE DECISION OF THE COLORADO COURT
OF APPEALS IN THE CASE DENOMINATED COLORADO CRIMINAL JUSTICE
REFORM COALITION V. ORTIZ, CASE NO. 04 CA 0879 (APRIL 7, 2005), THE
FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION
AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8 DO NOT
CONSTITUTE A MULTIPLE-FISCAL YEAR DIRECT OR INDIRECT DISTRICT DEBT
OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION WHATSOEVER FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION;
(b) A PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP ENTERED INTO BY A SCHOOL
DISTRICT, THE STATE, OR OTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY IN CONNECTION
WITH WORKFORCE HOUSING FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT
AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF SERVES A PUBLIC PURPOSE AND DOES NOT,
THEREFORE, VIOLATE SECTION 2 OF ARTICLE XI OF THE STATE
-14- SB26-139

CONSTITUTION; AND
(c) THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR WORKFORCE
HOUSING FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC
SCHOOL STAFF PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8 MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 3 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
22-43.8-103. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 43.8, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "APPLICANT" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY SUBMITS AN APPLICATION FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO THE
BOARD.
(2) "BOARD" MEANS THE WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE
BOARD CREATED IN SECTION 22-43.8-105.
(3) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
CREATED IN SECTION 24-1-115.
(4) "DIVISION OF HOUSING" MEANS THE DIVISION OF HOUSING
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS CREATED IN SECTION
24-32-704.
(5) "DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION
ASSISTANCE" MEANS THE DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT CREATED IN
SECTION 22-43.7-105.
(6) "FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT" MEANS A LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENT
BETWEEN THE STATE TREASURER AND A TRUSTEE ENTERED INTO
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-108 PURSUANT TO WHICH:
(a) THE STATE MAKES RENTAL PAYMENTS THAT INCLUDE
-15- SB26-139

PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST COMPONENTS; AND
(b) THE TRUSTEE, PURSUANT TO AN INDENTURE OF TRUST,
CREATES CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION EVIDENCING UNDIVIDED
INTERESTS IN THE PAYMENTS MADE BY THE STATE UNDER THE
LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENT.
(7) "FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE" MEANS MATCHING GRANTS MADE BY
THE BOARD FROM THE ASSISTANCE FUND TO APPLICANTS OR ANY OTHER
EXPENDITURES MADE FROM THE ASSISTANCE FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF
FINANCING WORKFORCE HOUSING AS AUTHORIZED BY THIS ARTICLE 43.8.
(8) "FUND" MEANS THE WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 22-43.8-104.
(9) "MATCHING MONEY" MEANS ANY INSTRUMENT OR MONEY AN
APPLICANT IS REQUIRED TO PAY TO THE STATE OR USE DIRECTLY TO PAY
A PORTION OF THE COSTS OF AN APPLICANT'S WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT AS A CONDITION OF AN AWARD OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO THE
APPLICANT PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-43.8-107 (12). MATCHING MONEY
MAY INCLUDE REVENUE OR PROCEEDS GENERATED FROM A LEASE, A
LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENT, A PRIVATE FINANCING, A GENERAL
OBLIGATION BOND, A REVENUE BOND ISSUED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT
ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-32-124.7 (2), OR A
NON-ENTERPRISE BOND ISSUED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 22-32-124.7 (3) FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING WORKFORCE
HOUSING, OR ANY OTHER MONEY OBTAINED BY AN APPLICANT.
(10) "SCHOOL DISTRICT" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT, OTHER THAN
A JUNIOR OR COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT, ORGANIZED AND EXISTING
PURSUANT TO LAW AND INCLUDES ANY WORKFORCE HOUSING ENTERPRISE
CREATED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT.
-16- SB26-139

(11) "SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT" MEANS A LEASE-PURCHASE AGREEMENT
BETWEEN THE STATE TREASURER AND A SCHOOL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO
WHICH A SCHOOL DISTRICT SUB-LEASE PURCHASES FROM THE STATE A
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT.
(12) "STATE BOARD" MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
CREATED AND EXISTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 1 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(13) "STATE HOUSING BOARD" MEANS THE STATE HOUSING BOARD
CREATED IN SECTION 24-32-706 (1).
(14) "TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC
SCHOOL STAFF" MEANS TEACHERS AND OTHER STAFF EMPLOYED BY A
SCHOOL DISTRICT OR BY A CHARTER SCHOOL THAT SERVES STUDENTS
WITHIN A SCHOOL DISTRICT'S BOUNDARIES.
(15) "WORKFORCE HOUSING" MEANS HOUSING OR RESIDENTIAL
FACILITIES INTENDED TO PRIMARILY HOUSE TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL
DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF.
(16) "WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES" MEANS THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION
22-43.8-106.
(17) "WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT" OR "PROJECT" MEANS AN
UNDERTAKING TO PROVIDE WORKFORCE HOUSING THROUGH THE
"BUILDING EXCELLENT TEACHER AND EMPLOYEE RESIDENCES ACT".
22-43.8-104. Workforce housing assistance fund - creation -
crediting of money to fund - use of fund.
(1) THE WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE FUND IS CREATED IN
-17- SB26-139

THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY CREDITED OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, MONEY
TRANSFERRED BY THE STATE TREASURER FROM THE STATE EDUCATION
FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-55-103 (7), AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME EARNED
ON THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE WORKFORCE HOUSING
ASSISTANCE FUND TO THE FUND.
(2) ON JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE FOLLOWING MONEY TO THE FUND:
(a) THE NET PROCEEDS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE STATE FROM THE
SALE OF INSTRUMENTS EVIDENCING RIGHTS TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS MADE
AND TO BE MADE UNDER THE TERMS OF A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN
ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT, UNLESS
OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY THE DOCUMENTS PURSUANT TO WHICH THE
INSTRUMENTS ARE ISSUED; AND
(b) MATCHING MONEY THAT AN APPLICANT PAYS TO THE STATE
FOR USE BY THE STATE IN MAKING SCHEDULED PAYMENTS UNDER THE
TERMS OF A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT.
(3) IF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY IN THE FUND THAT IS AVAILABLE TO
MAKE PAYMENTS UNDER A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT WILL BE INSUFFICIENT TO
COVER THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PAYMENTS REQUIRED BY THE FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR DIRECT THE STATE
TREASURER TO TRANSFER FROM ANY LEGALLY AVAILABLE SOURCE TO THE
-18- SB26-139

FUND SUFFICIENT MONEY TO MAKE THE PAYMENTS.
(4) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS, AS APPLICABLE,
FOR THE PURPOSES OF PAYING THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS INCURRED BY THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND DIVISION OF PUBLIC
SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE, THE BOARD, AND THE
DEPARTMENTS IN EXERCISING THEIR POWERS AND DUTIES PURSUANT TO
THIS ARTICLE 43.8; PROVIDING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE DIRECTLY TO
SCHOOL DISTRICTS IN THE FORM OF GRANTS THAT MAY EITHER BE FUNDED
FROM CASH OR FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE MULTIPLE FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENTS
ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8 AND PAYING ANY
TRANSACTION COSTS NECESSARILY INCURRED IN CONNECTION WITH THE
PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE; ENTERING INTO A FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT, A
SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE PURCHASE
AGREEMENT, AND AGREEMENTS REGARDING MATCHING MONEY; ISSUING
CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION,AND OTHER ACTIVITIES, AS AUTHORIZED
BY THIS ARTICLE 43.8.
(5) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE THAT
IT PROVIDES, AND AS A CONDITION OF ENTERING INTO A FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8, THE BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
BALANCE OF THE FUND IS AT LEAST EQUAL TO TWICE THE AMOUNT OF
PAYMENTS MADE BY THE STATE DURING THE NEXT STATE FISCAL YEAR
UNDER THE TERMS OF SUCH AN AGREEMENT, LESS THE AMOUNT OF ANY
SCHOOL DISTRICT MATCHING MONEY AND ANY FEDERAL MONEY TO BE
-19- SB26-139

RECEIVED FOR THE PURPOSE OF MAKING THE PAYMENTS. UPON
IDENTIFYING THE BALANCE OF THE FUND PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(5), THE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE AN AMOUNT IN THE FUND EQUAL TO
THAT BALANCE THAT SHALL SERVE AS A RESTRICTED RESERVE THAT MAY
ONLY BE USED TO MAKE PAYMENTS REQUIRED OF THE STATE BY THE
TERMS OF THE RELEVANT FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT.
22-43.8-105. Workforce housing assistance board - creation -
general powers and duties - rules.
(1) (a) THERE IS CREATED IN THE DEPARTMENT THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING ASSISTANCE BOARD. THE BOARD IS A TYPE 1 ENTITY, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 24-1-105, AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND PERFORMS ITS
DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS UNDER THE DEPARTMENT. THE BOARD CONSISTS
OF NINE APPOINTED MEMBERS, NONE OF WHOM SHALL HOLD ANY STATE
ELECTIVE OFFICE. FIVE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE BOARD CONSTITUTE A
QUORUM. BOARD MEMBERS ARE APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) THE STATE BOARD SHALL APPOINT THREE MEMBERS FROM
DIFFERENT AREAS OF THE STATE AND FROM URBAN, SUBURBAN, AND
RURAL SCHOOL DISTRICTS. THE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE STATE
BOARD SHALL INCLUDE:
(A) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL DISTRICT BOARD MEMBER AT
THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT;
(B) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT OR
ADMINISTRATOR IN CHARGE OF OPERATIONS AT THE TIME OF
APPOINTMENT; AND
(C) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PUBLIC SCHOOL TEACHER OR TENANT
OF SCHOOL DISTRICT-OWNED RENTAL HOUSING AT THE TIME OF
-20- SB26-139

APPOINTMENT.
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THREE MEMBERS. THE
MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR MUST HAVE SUBSTANTIAL
EXPERIENCE IN AFFORDABLE OR WORKFORCE HOUSING, INCLUDING
EXPERIENCE IN ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING: HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, ASSET MANAGEMENT, OR MULTIFAMILY
FINANCE.
(III) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL APPOINT TWO MEMBERS, ONE
OF WHOM SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND ONE OF WHOM SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE. THE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
MUST HAVE SUBSTANTIAL EXPERIENCE IN AFFORDABLE OR WORKFORCE
HOUSING, INCLUDING EXPERIENCE IN ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING:
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, ASSET MANAGEMENT, OR
MULTIFAMILY FINANCE.
(IV) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL APPOINT ONE MEMBER WITH
EXPERIENCE IN PUBLIC FINANCE INCLUDING THE ISSUANCE OF STATE
CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION, SCHOOL DISTRICT BONDS, AND HOUSING
PUBLIC FINANCE.
(b) (I) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL SERVE FOR TERMS OF TWO
YEARS AND MAY SERVE UP TO THREE CONSECUTIVE TERMS; EXCEPT THAT
THE TERM OF EACH MEMBER INITIALLY APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTIONS
(1)(a)(I) AND (1)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION IS ONE YEAR.
(II) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY FOR A MEMBER MAY REMOVE THE
MEMBER FOR ANY CAUSE THAT RENDERS THE MEMBER INCAPABLE OF
DISCHARGING OR UNFIT TO DISCHARGE THE MEMBER'S DUTIES.
-21- SB26-139

(III) THE APPROPRIATE APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL FILL ANY
VACANCY IN THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD BY APPOINTMENT, AND A
MEMBER APPOINTED TO FILL A VACANCY SHALL SERVE UNTIL THE
EXPIRATION OF THE TERM FOR WHICH THE VACANCY WAS FILLED.
(IV) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION
BUT ARE ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER
NECESSARY EXPENSES ACTUALLY INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF
THEIR DUTIES.
(V) THE BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(2) THE FUNCTION OF THE BOARD IS TO ASSIST IN THE PROVISION
OF WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL
DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF BY ENSURING THAT APPLICANTS CAN
LEVERAGE FUNDS TO PROVIDE AFFORDABLE WORKFORCE HOUSING
ASSISTANCE. IN PERFORMING ITS FUNCTION, THE BOARD SHALL ENSURE
THE MOST EQUITABLE, EFFICIENT, AND EFFECTIVE USE OF STATE REVENUES
DEDICATED TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING
PURSUANT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 43.8 AND BASED ON
OBJECTIVE CRITERIA REGARDING THE APPROPRIATE PRIORITIZATION AND
ALLOCATION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING. TO
FURTHER THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS FUNCTION, THE BOARD, IN ADDITION
TO ANY OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES SPECIFIED IN THIS ARTICLE 43.8, HAS
THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND DUTIES:
(a) TO ESTABLISH WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES;
(b) TO REVIEW FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE APPLICATIONS AND
DETERMINE A PRIORITIZED LIST OF PROJECTS TO RECEIVE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE AND THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE THAT
SHOULD BE PROVIDED FOR EACH PROJECT;
-22- SB26-139

(c) TO ESTABLISH GUIDELINES FOR THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND
DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE TO
FOLLOW WHEN ASSISTING POTENTIAL APPLICANTS IN IDENTIFYING
WORKFORCE HOUSING NEEDS AND PREPARING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
APPLICATIONS;
(d) WITH THE SUPPORT OF THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND DIVISION
OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE, TO ASSIST
APPLICANTS THAT CANNOT FEASIBLY MAINTAIN THEIR OWN
CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT STAFF IN IMPLEMENTING THE PROJECTS FOR
WHICH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IS PROVIDED, INCLUDING PROVIDING
ASSISTANCE WITH THE PREPARATION OF REQUESTS FOR BIDS OR
PROPOSALS, CONTRACT NEGOTIATIONS, CONTRACT IMPLEMENTATION, AND
PROJECT AND CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT;
(e) WITH THE SUPPORT OF THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND DIVISION
OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE, TO ASSIST
APPLICANTS IN IMPLEMENTING ENERGY-EFFICIENT HOUSING OR
RESIDENTIAL FACILITY DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PRACTICES;
(f) TO AUTHORIZE THE STATE TREASURER TO ENTER INTO
FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION
AGREEMENTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-108 IN ORDER TO FINANCE
WORKFORCE HOUSING CONSTRUCTION;
(g) TO ENTER INTO SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE STATE AND
APPLICANTS;
(h) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH PUBLIC ENTITIES AND PRIVATE
PARTIES, INCLUDING PUBLIC-PUBLIC AND PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS,
FOR THE ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, IMPROVEMENT, OWNERSHIP,
-23- SB26-139

OPERATION, LEASING, AND LEASE-PURCHASING OF WORKFORCE HOUSING;
AND
(i) (I) TO ESTABLISH RULES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 4 OF
TITLE 24, AS ARE NECESSARY AND PROPER FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF
THIS ARTICLE 43.8, INCLUDING:
(A) CONFLICT OF INTEREST RULES FOR BOARD MEMBERS;
(B) RULES ESTABLISHING EVALUATION CRITERIA FOR MATCHING
MONEY REQUIREMENT REDUCTION APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO THE
BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-107; AND
(C) RULES ESTABLISHING THE MEANS BY WHICH WORKFORCE
HOUSING FINANCED IN WHOLE OR IN PART WITH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
PROVIDED PURSUANT THIS ARTICLE 43.8 IS TO BE PUBLICLY IDENTIFIED AS
HAVING BEEN SO FINANCED.
(II) THE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF ANY PROPOSED BOARD
RULE TO THE STATE BOARD ON OR BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE
BOARD ISSUES A NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULE-MAKING FOR THE RULE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-4-103 (3).
22-43.8-106. Workforce housing guidelines - establishment by
board - use - definition.
(1) (a) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH WORKFORCE HOUSING
GUIDELINES FOR USE BY THE BOARD IN REVIEWING APPLICATIONS FOR
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, AND MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE
BOARD REGARDING APPROPRIATE ALLOCATION OF AWARDS OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE FROM THE FUND ONLY TO APPLICANTS. IN ESTABLISHING THE
GUIDELINES, THE BOARD SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DIVISION OF HOUSING
REGARDING HOUSING DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING UNDERWRITING
STANDARDS, FINANCIAL FEASIBILITY CRITERIA, AND COMPLIANCE
-24- SB26-139

REQUIREMENTS, AND SHALL CONSIDER STANDARDS AND PRACTICES USED
BY THE DIVISION OF HOUSING IN ADMINISTERING STATE HOUSING
PROGRAMS. THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH THE GUIDELINES IN RULES
PROMULGATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24.
(b) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) THE WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES MUST IDENTIFY AND
DESCRIBE HOUSING NEEDS FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT
AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF AND THE MEANS OF ADDRESSING THOSE NEEDS
AT A REASONABLE COST AND IN A MANNER THAT WILL RESULT IN
AFFORDABLE HOUSING. THE BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING GUIDELINES INCLUDE GUIDELINES THAT ADDRESS THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) BUILDING PERFORMANCE STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES, FOR
THE PURPOSES OF UTILITY COST REDUCTION, INCLUDING GREEN BUILDING
AND ENERGY EFFICIENCY CRITERIA AS SPECIFIED IN EXECUTIVE ORDER
D0012 07, "GREENING OF STATE GOVERNMENT: DETAILED
IMPLEMENTATION", ISSUED BY THE GOVERNOR ON APRIL 16, 2007, OR ANY
SUBSEQUENT EXECUTIVE ORDERS OR OTHER POLICY DIRECTIVES
CONCERNING GREEN BUILDING AND ENERGY EFFICIENCY CRITERIA ISSUED
BY THE GOVERNOR OR THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE;
(II) REQUIRING A REVIEW WITH THE INCUMBENT ELECTRIC UTILITY
REGARDING ENERGY EFFICIENCY; BENEFICIAL ELECTRIFICATION, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 40-1-102 (1.2); AND RENEWABLE DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION OPPORTUNITIES;
(III) THE CURRENT CAPACITY OF EXISTING AND PLANNED
-25- SB26-139

WORKFORCE HOUSING AND DIFFERENT METHODS OF EVALUATING THAT
CAPACITY, TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION POTENTIAL EXPANSION OF
STUDENT POPULATIONS AND SERVICES FOR THE BENEFIT OF STUDENTS
SUCH AS FULL-DAY KINDERGARTEN AND PRESCHOOL- AND SCHOOL-BASED
HEALTH SERVICES;
(IV) WORKFORCE HOUSING ACCESSIBILITY;
(V) THE ABILITY OF AN APPLICANT TO PARTNER WITH LOCAL OR
STATE GOVERNMENT, LOCAL OR STATE HOUSING AUTHORITIES, OR OTHER
EMPLOYERS, SPECIFICALLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF LEVERAGING LAND AND
IMPROVING PROJECT ECONOMICS;
(VI) LONG-TERM FINANCIAL SUSTAINABILITY STANDARDS THAT
REQUIRE AN APPLICANT TO DEMONSTRATE:
(A) POSITIVE CASH FLOW AFTER PAYING MATCHING MONEY TO THE
FUND;
(B) AN OPERATIONS EXPENSE ESCALATION RATE THAT IS NO LESS
THAN THE INCOME ESCALATION RATE; AND
(C) CAPITAL REPLACEMENT RESERVES FUNDED ANNUALLY AT A
LEVEL SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE PROJECTED COST OF MAJOR SYSTEM
REPLACEMENTS OVER THE THIRTY-YEAR OPERATING PLAN REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-107 (7)(g) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
STATE TREASURER;
(VII) REQUIRING APPLICANTS TO IMPLEMENT SAFEGUARDS TO
PROTECT TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL
STAFF RESIDING IN WORKFORCE HOUSING FROM UNDUE INFLUENCE OR
COERCION ARISING FROM THE DISTRICT'S ROLE AS BOTH EMPLOYER AND
HOUSING PROVIDER. AT A MINIMUM, SUCH GUIDELINES MUST INCLUDE A
REQUIREMENT THAT THE APPLICANT RETAIN A QUALIFIED THIRD-PARTY
-26- SB26-139

PROPERTY MANAGER TO EXERCISE INDEPENDENT AUTHORITY OVER
DAY-TO-DAY LANDLORD FUNCTIONS, INCLUDING LEASING, RENT
COLLECTION, MAINTENANCE, AND ENFORCEMENT OF LEASE TERMS, WITH
A PREFERENCE FOR NONPROFIT HOUSING ORGANIZATIONS OR PUBLIC
HOUSING AUTHORITIES WHERE AVAILABLE AND A REQUIREMENT THAT
GOVERNANCE AND ADMINISTRATION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING BE
STRUCTURALLY AND OPERATIONALLY SEPARATE FROM THE APPLICANT'S
HUMAN RESOURCES FUNCTIONS.
(VIII) DEFINING "NONPROFIT HOUSING ORGANIZATION" AND
"PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY" FOR PURPOSES OF THE GUIDELINES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(VII) OF THIS SECTION, IN A MANNER
THAT REQUIRES SUCH AN ORGANIZATION OR AUTHORITY TO:
(A) HAVE A PRIMARY MISSION OF PROVIDING AFFORDABLE OR
WORKFORCE HOUSING;
(B) HAVE EXPERIENCE IN MANAGING MULTIFAMILY RENTAL
HOUSING; AND
(C) OPERATE INDEPENDENTLY FROM THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
(IX) REQUIRING THAT TENANT ELIGIBILITY AND PRIORITIZATION
POLICIES FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING DEVELOPED WITH FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 43.8 DO NOT EXCLUDE OR
DISADVANTAGE OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS SOLELY ON THE BASIS
THAT THE APPLICANT IS EMPLOYED BY A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED
BY OR OPERATING WITHIN THE GEOGRAPHIC BOUNDARIES OF THE
APPLICANT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT; AND
(X) A STRUCTURE OF BONUS FUNDS TO INCENTIVIZE DEVELOPMENT
IN RURAL DISTRICTS AND TO INCENTIVIZE MULTIJURISDICITIONAL
PROJECTS, ESPECIALLY IN RURAL DISTRICTS.
-27- SB26-139

(b) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE ONE OR MORE OF THE GUIDELINES
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTIONS (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), AND (2)(a)(VII) OF THIS
SECTION.
22-43.8-107. Financial assistance for workforce housing -
application requirements - evaluation criteria - local match
requirements - affordability requirements - use requirements - rules.
(1) THE BOARD, WITH THE SUPPORT OF THE DIVISION OF HOUSING
AND THE DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE
SHALL PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO AN APPLICANT FOR A
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT AS SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION ONLY SO
LONG AS:
(a) THE APPLICANT OWNS OR WILL HAVE THE RIGHT TO OWN THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT OR A LEASEHOLD INTEREST IN THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT;
(b) THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT WILL SATISFY THE
AFFORDABILITY REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION;
(c) THE APPLICANT HAS SAFEGUARDS TO PROHIBIT CONSIDERING
WORKFORCE HOUSING OCCUPANCY, TENANCY, STATUS, OR LEASE
COMPLIANCE AS A FACTOR IN HIRING, TERMINATION, PROMOTION,
PERFORMANCE EVALUATION, DISCIPLINARY ACTION, OR ANY OTHER
EMPLOYMENT-RELATED DECISION;
(d) THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT WILL SATISFY THE
TENANCY REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(e) THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT WILL SATISFY THE
ENVIRONMENTAL AND BUILDING REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
-28- SB26-139

BOARD PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH AFFORDABILITY
REQUIREMENTS FOR ANY WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT TO ENSURE THAT
THE APPLICANTS COMPLY WITH AFFORDABILITY PROTECTIONS IN RELATION
TO THE PROJECT INCLUDING:
(I) AFFORDABILITY STANDARDS CONSISTENT WITH THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT
GUIDELINES, SPECIFICALLY ENSURING THAT TOTAL MONTHLY HOUSING
COSTS, INCLUDING RENT AND A REASONABLE UTILITY ALLOWANCE, DO
NOT EXCEED THIRTY PERCENT OF THE GROSS MONTHLY HOUSEHOLD
INCOME FOR THE TARGETED WORKFORCE UTILIZING THE HOUSING OR
RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES IN THE PROJECT; AND
(II) REQUIRING THAT THE PROJECT IS SUBJECT TO A RECORDED
RESTRICTED COVENANT WITH AFFORDABILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
DURATION OF ANY FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 43.8 FOR THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT.
(b) REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2) SHALL NOT PRECLUDE APPLICANTS FROM INCLUDING
COMPONENTS OF TENANT EQUITY OR OTHER INSTRUMENTS THAT
ALLOCATE A PORTION OF RENTAL PAYMENTS TO FUTURE HOUSING NEEDS
OF THE TENANT.
(c) UPON THE EXPIRATION OF A RECORDED RESTRICTED COVENANT
WITH AFFORDABILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT, THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT SHALL EITHER:
(I) BE MAINTAINED FOR ITS ORIGINAL PURPOSE WITH EQUAL OR
GREATER LEVELS OF AFFORDABILITY FOR THIRTY YEARS OR MORE; OR
(II) BE SUBJECT TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S RIGHT OF FIRST
-29- SB26-139

REFUSAL TO PURCHASE MULTIFAMILY HOUSING ESTABLISHED PURSUANT
TO PART 12 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 29.
(3) (a) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH TENANCY REQUIREMENTS
FOR ANY WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT TO ENSURE THAT:
(I) NO LESS THAN EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE HOUSING OR
RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES IN THE PROJECT MUST BE RENTED USING A
TENANT SELECTION PROCESS THAT PRIORITIZES TEACHERS AND OTHER
SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF THAT ARE EMPLOYED BY THE
APPLICANT OR PUBLIC SCHOOLS WITHIN THE APPLICANT'S BOUNDARIES;
AND
(II) AFTER ACCOUNTING FOR THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE REMAINING HOUSING OR RESIDENTIAL
FACILITIES MUST BE RENTED USING A TENANT SELECTION PROCESS THAT
PRIORITIZES EMPLOYEES OF LOCAL GOVERNMENTS OR NONPROFIT
CHILDCARE PROVIDERS;
(b) A SCHOOL DISTRICT CAN APPLY TO THE BOARD FOR A WAIVER
FROM THE TENANT SELECTION PROCESS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a)
OF THIS SECTION, TO MAINTAIN THE SOLVENCY OF A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT.
(c) THE PREFERENCE FOR TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT
AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS
SECTION DOES NOT CONSTITUTE SOURCE OF INCOME DISCRIMINATION FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 24-34-502.
(d) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH LEASE TERMINATION AND
TRANSITION GUIDELINES THAT INCLUDE:
(I) REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO MAINTAINING QUALIFIED
EMPLOYMENT;
-30- SB26-139

(II) NOTICE PERIODS TO VACATE THE UNIT, UNLESS EVICTION FOR
CAUSE IS WARRANTED UNRELATED TO EMPLOYMENT STATUS; AND
(III) CIRCUMSTANCES WHEN A TENANT CANNOT BE REQUIRED TO
VACATE A UNIT, SUCH AS QUALIFYING TENANT LIFE EVENTS, INCLUDING
RETIREMENT AFTER A SPECIFIED SERVICE PERIOD, DISABILITY, OR DEATH
OF THE PRIMARY LEASEHOLDER.
(4) (a) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH ENVIRONMENTAL AND
BUILDING REQUIREMENTS INCLUDING REQUIRING:
(I) WATERWISE LANDSCAPING;
(II) APPLICANTS TO DESIGN WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS FOR
FULL ELECTRIFICATION OR, IF FULL ELECTRIFICATION IS NOT FEASIBLE,
APPLICANTS TO DEMONSTRATE WHY FULL ELECTRIFICATION IS NOT
FEASIBLE AND TO PROVIDE ADEQUATE PANEL CAPACITY, DEDICATED
ELECTRIC PANEL SPACE, ELECTRICAL WIRE, ELECTRICAL RECEPTACLES,
AND ADEQUATE PHYSICAL SPACE AS NECESSARY TO ACCOMMODATE
FUTURE INSTALLATION OF HIGH-EFFICIENCY ELECTRIC APPLIANCES
INCLUDING HEATING, WATER HEATING, COOKING, DRYING, AND ELECTRIC
VEHICLES;
(III) COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE LATEST
INTERNATIONAL ENERGY CONSERVATION CODE; AND
(IV) COMPLETION OF AN ENERGY LIFE CYCLE COST ANALYSIS
ALIGNED WITH STATE METHODOLOGIES.
(b) A SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY APPLY TO THE BOARD FOR A WAIVER
FROM THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND BUILDING REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO MAINTAIN THE SOLVENCY OF A
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT.
(5) THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE THAT APPLICANTS OBTAIN
-31- SB26-139

NECESSARY PROJECT BUILDING PERMITS WITHIN ONE YEAR OF NOTICE OF
AWARD AND THAT CONSTRUCTION SHALL COMMENCE ON THE RELEVANT
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT WITHIN TWO YEARS OF NOTICE OF AWARD;
EXCEPT THAT THE BOARD MAY EXTEND THE DEADLINES DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (5) IF THE BOARD DETERMINES THAT THE PROJECT HAS BEEN
UNREASONABLY DELAYED DUE TO CIRCUMSTANCES OUTSIDE OF THE
APPLICANT'S CONTROL.
(6) (a) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TIMELINE FOR USE BY APPLICANTS IN APPLYING FOR
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE AND OTHERWISE MEETING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
REQUIREMENTS AND FOR USE BY THE BOARD IN REVIEWING FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE APPLICATIONS AND MAKING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE AWARDS.
THE TIMELINE MUST SPECIFY:
(I) A DEADLINE FOR APPLICANTS TO SUBMIT FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE APPLICATIONS TO THE BOARD THAT ALLOWS SUFFICIENT TIME
FOR SUBMISSION OF THE APPLICATIONS;
(II) THE PERIOD IN WHICH THE BOARD, WITH THE SUPPORT OF THE
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE, SHALL REVIEW FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
APPLICATIONS AT LEAST BIANNUALLY;
(III) A DEADLINE, NO LATER THAN JUNE 1, 2027, AND NO LATER
THAN JUNE 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, FOR THE BOARD TO CREATE AN
INITIAL PRIORITIZED LIST OF PROJECTS FOR THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE IN THE NEXT STATE FISCAL YEAR; AND
(IV) ANY ADDITIONAL DEADLINES OR DEADLINE EXTENSION
PERIODS NEEDED TO ENSURE THAT APPLICANTS SEEKING VOTER APPROVAL
TO OBTAIN MATCHING MONEY REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (12)
-32- SB26-139

OF THIS SECTION HAVE SUFFICIENT OPPORTUNITY TO OBTAIN SUCH VOTER
APPROVAL OR OTHERWISE NEEDED TO ENSURE THE EFFICIENT AND
EFFECTIVE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS ARTICLE 43.8.
(7) AN APPLICANT MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO THE BOARD IN A FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
BOARD AND MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING IN THE APPLICATION:
(a) A DESCRIPTION OF THE SCOPE AND NATURE OF THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING PROJECT FOR WHICH THE APPLICANT IS SEEKING FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE;
(b) A DESCRIPTION OF THE ARCHITECTURAL, FUNCTIONAL, AND
CONSTRUCTION STANDARDS THAT THE APPLICANT WILL APPLY TO THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT, WHETHER THOSE STANDARDS ARE
CONSISTENT WITH THE WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES, AND AN
EXPLANATION FOR THE USE OF ANY STANDARD THAT THE APPLICANT WILL
APPLY TO THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT THAT IS NOT CONSISTENT
WITH THE WORKFORCE HOUSING GUIDELINES;
(c) THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE THAT THE
APPLICANT NEEDS FOR THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT AND THE FORM
AND AMOUNT OF MATCHING MONEY THAT THE APPLICANT WILL PROVIDE
FOR THE PROJECT;
(d) A PLAN BY THE APPLICANT TO MAINTAIN THE PROJECT OVER
TIME THAT INCLUDES, AT A MINIMUM, THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A CAPITAL
RENEWAL BUDGET AND A COMMITMENT TO MAKE ANNUAL CONTRIBUTIONS
TO A CAPITAL RENEWAL RESERVE WITHIN A SCHOOL DISTRICT'S CAPITAL
RESERVE FUND OR ANY FUNCTIONALLY SIMILAR RESERVE FUND
SEPARATELY MAINTAINED BY AN APPLICANT THAT IS NOT A SCHOOL
DISTRICT;
-33- SB26-139

(e) A STATEMENT REGARDING THE MEANS BY WHICH THE
APPLICANT INTENDS TO PROVIDE MATCHING MONEY REQUIRED FOR THE
PROJECTS, INCLUDING MEANS SUCH AS VOTER-APPROVED GENERAL
OBLIGATION BONDS OR OTHER MULTIPLE-FISCAL YEAR DEBT OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS; SCHOOL DISTRICT ENTERPRISE REVENUE BONDS
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-32-124.7 (2); REVENUE BONDS AS DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 22-32-124.7 (3); LEASE OR LEASE-PURCHASE FINANCING,
GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS; OR ANY OTHER MEANS OF FINANCING
PERMITTED BY LAW; OR THE INTENT OF THE APPLICANT TO SEEK A
REDUCTION OF THE MATCHING MONEY REQUIREMENT PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (13) OF THIS SECTION. IF AN APPLICANT INTENDS TO RAISE
MATCHING MONEY BY OBTAINING VOTER APPROVAL TO ISSUE BONDS OR
TO ENTER INTO A SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE
OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT THAT CONSTITUTES AN INDEBTEDNESS OR
MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OF THE DISTRICT AS
AUTHORIZED BY SECTION 22-32-127, IT SHALL INDICATE WHETHER IT HAS
RECEIVED THE REQUIRED VOTER APPROVAL OR, IF THE ELECTION HAS NOT
ALREADY BEEN HELD, THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF THE ELECTION.
(f) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY EFFORTS BY THE APPLICANT TO
COORDINATE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS WITH LOCAL
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES OR COMMUNITY-BASED OR OTHER
ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE AFFORDABLE HOUSING IN ORDER TO MORE
EFFICIENTLY OR EFFECTIVELY PROVIDE SUCH FACILITIES OR SERVICES,
INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF ANY FINANCIAL COMMITMENT RECEIVED
FROM ANY SUCH ENTITY OR ORGANIZATION THAT WILL ALLOW BETTER
LEVERAGING OF ANY FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE AWARDED;
(g) A THIRTY-YEAR OPERATING PLAN THAT DEMONSTRATES THE
-34- SB26-139

PROJECT'S FINANCIAL VIABILITY, INCLUDING PROJECTED RENTAL INCOME,
VACANCY RATES, OPERATING EXPENSES, DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO,
AND CAPITAL REPLACEMENT RESERVES;
(h) A MARKET STUDY VERIFYING THE DEMAND FOR THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING INCLUDING THE PROPOSED DWELLING UNIT MIX AND
RENT LEVELS, THROUGH METHODS INCLUDING A SURVEY OF CURRENT
TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF AND
AN ANALYSIS OF THE LOCAL RENTAL MARKET;
(i) A CERTIFICATION BY THE APPLICANT THAT ITS TENANT
ELIGIBILITY AND PRIORITIZATION POLICIES FOR A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT FINANCED UNDER THIS ARTICLE 43.8, WHILE ESTABLISHED IN THE
APPLICANT'S DISCRETION, DO NOT EXCLUDE OR DISADVANTAGE
OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS SOLELY ON THE BASIS THAT THE
APPLICANT IS EMPLOYED BY A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY OR
OPERATING WITHIN THE APPLICANT'S SCHOOL DISTRICT. NOTHING IN THIS
SUBSECTION (7)(i) REQUIRES AN APPLICANT TO GUARANTEE PLACEMENT,
ESTABLISH QUOTAS, OR LIMIT THE APPLICANT'S AUTHORITY TO ADOPT
NEUTRAL, OBJECTIVE ELIGIBILITY OR PRIORITIZATION CRITERIA
CONSISTENT WITH STATE AND FEDERAL LAW.
(j) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE BOARD MAY REQUIRE FOR
THE EVALUATION OF THE PROJECT.
(8) THE BOARD SHALL PRIORITIZE, IN DESCENDING ORDER OF
IMPORTANCE, APPLICATIONS THAT DESCRIBE WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECTS DEEMED ELIGIBLE FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE THAT:
(a) ARE LOCATED IN JURISDICTIONS WITH DOCUMENTED HOUSING
SHORTAGES RESULTING IN CHALLENGES RETAINING AND ATTRACTING
SUFFICIENT TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL
-35- SB26-139

STAFF TO PROVIDE CURRENT AND PLANNED SERVICES;
(b) WILL REDUCE THE HOUSING COST BURDEN ON CURRENT
TEACHERS AND OTHER SCHOOL DISTRICT AND PUBLIC SCHOOL STAFF;
(c) HAVE HIGH FINANCIAL FEASIBILITY AND THE ABILITY TO
MAINTAIN POSITIVE CASH FLOW WITHOUT ONGOING SUBSIDIES OR
SUPPORT;
(d) ARE PROPOSED BY APPLICANTS THAT DEMONSTRATE
SIGNIFICANT APPLICANT EFFORTS TO ADDRESS PROJECT COSTS BEYOND
OPERATING INCOME, SUCH AS LAND OR PARTNERSHIP CONTRIBUTIONS AND
MULTIJURISTICTIONAL PARTICIPATION;
(e) HAVE A PROPERTY MANAGEMENT PLAN SUPPORTING THE
ASSUMPTIONS IN THE THIRTY-YEAR OPERATION PLAN REQUIRED PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (7)(g) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(f) ARE THE MOST ADVANCED IN THE DEVELOPMENT PROCESS.
(9) THE BOARD MAY REQUEST THAT THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND
DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE
UNDERTAKE A PRELIMINARY REVIEW OF ANY OR ALL APPLICATIONS FOR
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, AND THE BOARD MAY ALSO REQUEST THAT ANY
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR INSTITUTION OF STATE GOVERNMENT WITH
EXPERTISE OR EXPERIENCE IN HOUSING AFFORDABILITY OR CONSTRUCTION
PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO THE BOARD WITH REGARD TO THE EVALUATION
OF THE APPLICATIONS FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.
(10) (a) AFTER COMPLETING THE INITIAL PRIORITIZED LIST OF
PROJECTS FOR THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT THAT LIST TO
THE STATE BOARD AND THE STATE HOUSING BOARD. THE PRIORITIZED LIST
MUST INCLUDE:
-36- SB26-139

(I) THE BOARD'S DECISION AS TO THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO BE PROVIDED; AND
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE SOURCE AND AMOUNT OF APPLICANT
MATCHING MONEY FOR EACH RECOMMENDED PROJECT BASED UPON
INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE APPLICANT.
(b) UPON RECEIVING THE BOARD'S INITIAL PRIORITIZED LIST OF
PROJECTS FOR THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (10)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AND BEFORE THE BOARD
DETERMINES A FINAL PRIORITIZED LIST OF PROJECTS FOR WHICH THE
BOARD WILL PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(11)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE BOARD AND THE STATE HOUSING
BOARD MAY PROVIDE COMMENTS TO THE BOARD ON THE LIST OF PROJECTS.
(11) (a) NO LATER THAN JULY 15, 2027, AND EACH JULY 15
THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE A FINAL PRIORITIZED LIST OF
PROJECTS FOR WHICH THE BOARD WILL PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.
(b) (I) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF EACH RECOMMENDED
AWARD OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, THE BOARD SHALL SEEK TO BE AS
EQUITABLE AS PRACTICABLE BY CONSIDERING THE TOTAL FINANCIAL
CAPACITY OF EACH APPLICANT.
(II) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF EACH AWARD OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE, THE BOARD SHALL SEEK TO ADDRESS THE MOST CRITICAL
EDUCATION WORKFORCE HOUSING NEEDS, OPTIMIZE THE USE OF LIMITED
STATE GRANT FUNDING, AND PROVIDE THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF NEW
HOUSING UNITS.
(c) THE BOARD MAY DECIDE THAT A SPECIFIC PROJECT SHALL ONLY
RECEIVE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IF A HIGHER PRIORITY PROJECT OR GROUP
OF PROJECTS BECOMES INELIGIBLE FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE DUE TO THE
-37- SB26-139

INABILITY OF AN APPLICANT TO RAISE THE REQUIRED MATCHING MONEY
BY A DEADLINE PRESCRIBED BY THE BOARD AS A CONDITION OF A
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE AWARD FOR THE HIGHER PRIORITY PROJECT OR
GROUP OF PROJECTS.
(12) (a) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (13) OF
THIS SECTION, THE BOARD MAY APPROVE OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR
A WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT ONLY IF THE APPLICANT PROVIDES
MATCHING MONEY IN AN AMOUNT AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE PORTION OF
THE TOTAL DEVELOPMENT COST OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT
THAT CAN BE FINANCED WITH AND SUPPORTED BY NET OPERATING INCOME
GENERATED FROM THE PROJECT.
(b) STATE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT SHALL NOT EXCEED, BUT MAY BE LESS THAN, THE PORTION OF
THE AMOUNT OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT'S TOTAL
DEVELOPMENT COST THAT EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT THAT THE APPLICANT
CAN FINANCE AND SUPPORT WITH THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT'S
NET OPERATING INCOME.
(c) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (12), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(I) "NET OPERATING INCOME" MEANS GROSS RENTAL REVENUES
LESS ALL NECESSARY AND CUSTOMARY OPERATING EXPENSES, INCLUDING
PROPERTY MANAGEMENT, MAINTENANCE, INSURANCE, AND REQUIRED
OPERATING AND REPLACEMENT RESERVES, AND MUST BE CALCULATED
AFTER APPLICATION OF ANY REQUIRED DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO
AND THE FUNDING OF ALL REQUIRED BOND OR LEASE-PURCHASE DEBT
SERVICE RESERVES.
(II) "TOTAL DEVELOPMENT COSTS" MEANS THE COSTS
-38- SB26-139

DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO BE NECESSARY FOR AN APPLICANT TO
PLAN, FINANCE, ACQUIRE, CONSTRUCT, AND PLACE INTO OPERATION A
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT.
(13) (a) AN APPLICANT MAY APPLY TO THE BOARD FOR A
REDUCTION OF THE MATCHING MONEY REQUIREMENT SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (12) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE BOARD MAY GRANT A REDUCTION IF IT DETERMINES THAT
COMPLYING WITH THE MATCHING MONEY REQUIREMENT WOULD
SIGNIFICANTLY IMPAIR THE FINANCIAL FEASIBILITY OF THE PROJECT OR
IMPOSE AN UNDUE BURDEN ON THE APPLICANT, CONSIDERING LOCAL
HOUSING CONDITIONS, FINANCIAL CAPACITY, AND DEMONSTRATED
WORKFORCE HOUSING NEED.
(14) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE
43.8, IF A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT TERMINATES BEFORE ALL CERTIFICATES OF
PARTICIPATION EVIDENCING UNDIVIDED INTERESTS IN PAYMENTS UNDER
THAT AGREEMENT ARE PAID IN FULL AND TITLE TO A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT IS TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE, ANY AFFORDABILITY COVENANT,
ANY OTHER COVENANT, AND ANY OTHER RESTRICTION ON THE USE OF
THAT WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT THAT IS IMPOSED BY OR IS ENTERED
INTO OR IMPOSED IN ORDER TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 43.8,
AUTOMATICALLY TERMINATES UPON TERMINATION OF THAT FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT.
22-43.8-108. Financial assistance - grants - financed purchase
of an asset agreements.
(1) THE BOARD MAY PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR THOSE
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS FOR WHICH THE BOARD HAS AUTHORIZED
-39- SB26-139

THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
22-43.8-107 BY PROVIDING MATCHING GRANTS FROM THE FUND.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS AND LIMITATIONS,
THE BOARD MAY ALSO INSTRUCT THE STATE TREASURER TO ENTER INTO A
FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION
AGREEMENT TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO APPLICANTS BY
FINANCING WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS:
(a) THE MAXIMUM TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANNUAL PAYMENTS
PAYABLE BY THE STATE MINUS ANY MATCHING MONEY DURING ANY
FISCAL YEAR UNDER THE TERMS OF ALL OUTSTANDING FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENTS
AS INSTRUCTED BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS:
(I) TWELVE MILLION DOLLARS FOR THE 2027-28 STATE FISCAL
YEAR;
(II) TWENTY-FOUR MILLION DOLLARS FOR THE 2028-29 STATE
FISCAL YEAR; AND
(III) THIRTY-SIX MILLION DOLLARS FOR THE 2029-30 STATE FISCAL
YEAR AND EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.
(b) WHENEVER THE STATE TREASURER ENTERS INTO A FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) TO FINANCE WORKFORCE HOUSING,
THE BOARD SHALL, UPON RECEIVING APPROVAL OF THE STATE TREASURER
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(e) OF THIS SECTION, ENTER INTO A
SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION
AGREEMENT FOR THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT WITH THE APPLICANT
THAT WILL USE THE WORKFORCE HOUSING. THE SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE
OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT:
-40- SB26-139

(I) MUST REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO PERFORM FOR THE STATE
ALL DUTIES OF THE STATE TO MAINTAIN AND OPERATE THE WORKFORCE
HOUSING PROJECT THAT ARE REQUIRED BY THE FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN
ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT AND TO MAKE
PERIODIC RENTAL PAYMENTS TO THE STATE, UNLESS THE APPLICANT
MAKES A PAYMENT IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF REQUIRED
MATCHING MONEY IN ANOTHER FASHION, WHICH PAYMENTS SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND AS MATCHING MONEY OF THE APPLICANT;
(II) MUST PROVIDE FOR THE TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP OF THE
WORKFORCE HOUSING FROM THE STATE TO THE APPLICANT UPON THE
FULFILLMENT OF BOTH THE STATE'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
AND THE APPLICANT'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE
OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT; AND
(III) MAY PROVIDE THAT THE LEGAL OBLIGATION OF AN APPLICANT
TO MAKE PERIODIC RENTAL PAYMENTS IS SUBJECT TO THE ANNUAL
APPROPRIATION OF MONEY FOR THAT PURPOSE BY THE APPLICANT IF THE
ABSENCE OF SUCH A PROVISION WOULD CREATE A DISTRICT
MULTIPLE-YEAR FISCAL OBLIGATION WITHOUT VOTER APPROVAL IN
ADVANCE IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 20 (4)(b) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(c) A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) MUST PROVIDE THAT ALL PAYMENT OBLIGATIONS OF THE
STATE UNDER THE AGREEMENT ARE SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION
BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THAT OBLIGATIONS SHALL NOT BE
DEEMED OR CONSTRUED AS CREATING AN INDEBTEDNESS OR MULTIPLE
-41- SB26-139

FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OF THE STATE WITHIN THE MEANING
OF ANY PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE
STATE CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR
MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATION BY THE STATE.
(d) (I) (A) A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE
OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BY THE STATE TREASURER
ON BEHALF OF THE STATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) MAY
CONTAIN TERMS, PROVISIONS, AND CONDITIONS THE STATE TREASURER
DEEMS APPROPRIATE AND MAY FURTHER PROVIDE FOR THE ISSUANCE,
DISTRIBUTION, AND SALE OF INSTRUMENTS EVIDENCING RIGHTS TO
RECEIVE RENTALS AND OTHER PAYMENTS MADE AND TO BE MADE UNDER
THE AGREEMENT.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d) ALLOWS THE STATE TO RECEIVE TITLE
TO THE REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A
FINANCIAL PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATION OF PARTICIPATION
AGREEMENT ON OR PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF THE ENTIRE TERM OF THE
AGREEMENT, INCLUDING ALL OPTIONAL RENEWAL TERMS.
(II) A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) SHALL NOT BE NOTES, BONDS, OR ANY OTHER EVIDENCE
OF INDEBTEDNESS OR MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OF
THE STATE WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY PROVISION OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE STATE CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE
CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR MULTIPLE FISCAL YEAR OBLIGATION BY
THE STATE.
(III) INTEREST PAID UNDER A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF THE STATE
-42- SB26-139

PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), INCLUDING INTEREST REPRESENTED
BY SUCH INSTRUMENTS, SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM COLORADO INCOME TAX
AND ALL OTHER TAXATION AND ASSESSMENTS BY THE STATE OR ANY
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(e) THE BOARD MAY ONLY ENTER INTO A SUB-FINANCED PURCHASE
OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ON BEHALF
OF THE STATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) IF THE STATE
TREASURER HAS REVIEWED THE AGREEMENT AND PROVIDED WRITTEN
AUTHORIZATION TO THE BOARD TO ENTER INTO THE AGREEMENT.
(f) IF THE STATE TREASURER DEEMS IT NECESSARY OR ADVISABLE,
THE STATE TREASURER MAY ENTER INTO A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN
ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) FOR ONLY A PORTION OF A WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT
FOR ALL OR A PORTION OF A DIFFERENT WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT OR
FOR OTHER PROPERTY OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT.
(g) NOTWITHSTANDING THE AUTHORITY OF THE BOARD TO
INSTRUCT THE STATE TREASURER TO ENTER INTO A FINANCED PURCHASE
OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), IN ORDER TO ENSURE THAT THE FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
IS ENTERED INTO UNDER FAVORABLE FINANCIAL MARKET CONDITIONS, THE
STATE TREASURER SHALL HAVE SOLE DISCRETION TO DETERMINE THE
TIMING OF THE STATE TREASURER'S ENTRY INTO ANY FINANCED PURCHASE
OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(3) AN APPLICANT SHALL NOT USE ANY MONEY RECEIVED
THROUGH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
-43- SB26-139

43.8 FOR A WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT THAT RECEIVES PUBLIC
SUBSIDIES THROUGH A LOCAL, STATE, OR FEDERAL GOVERNMENT
PROGRAM THAT IS PRIMARILY INTENDED TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT
OF INCOME-RESTRICTED RENTAL HOUSING FOR HOUSEHOLDS WITH
INCOMES AT OR BELOW SIXTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(4) (a) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, UPON DETERMINING THAT IT
WILL TERMINATE A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE
OF THAT DETERMINATION TO:
(I) THE BOARD;
(II) THE COLORADO HOUSING AND FINANCE AUTHORITY CREATED
IN PART 7 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 29;
(III) THE COLORADO OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-101;
(IV) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION CREATED IN SECTION
24-1-115;
(V) THE DIVISION OF HOUSING; AND
(VI) ANY PARTIES TO A SUBLEASE AGREEMENT RELATED TO THE
LEASE.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
FAILURE OF THE STATE TREASURER TO PROVIDE NOTICE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT PREVENT THE STATE
TREASURER FROM TERMINATING A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND DOES NOT CREATE STATE LIABILITY
OR OBLIGATION.
-44- SB26-139

22-43.8-109. Reporting requirements - auditing by state
auditor.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), NO LATER
THAN FEBRUARY 15, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN EACH FEBRUARY 15
THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL PRESENT A WRITTEN REPORT TO THE
EDUCATION AND FINANCE COMMITTEES OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND THE SENATE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES,
REGARDING THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO APPLICANTS
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE, AT A
MINIMUM:
(a) AN ACCOUNTING OF THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED
THROUGH THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A STATEMENT OF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE AWARDED THROUGH THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING
STATEMENTS OF THE AMOUNT OF GRANTS PROVIDED, AND THE AMOUNT OF
PAYMENTS MADE AND PAYMENTS COMMITTED TO BE MADE BUT NOT YET
MADE IN CONNECTION WITH A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT;
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED AS GRANTS AND THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF
PAYMENTS MADE IN CONNECTION WITH A FINANCED PURCHASE OF AN
ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT DURING THE PRIOR
FISCAL YEAR;
(III) A LIST OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS FOR WHICH
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE HAS BEEN PROVIDED IN ANY FISCAL YEAR, WHICH
MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF EACH PROJECT;
-45- SB26-139

(B) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED FOR EACH PROJECT AND, WHERE APPLICABLE, THE
AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE COMMITTED TO BE PROVIDED FOR BUT
NOT YET PROVIDED FOR EACH PROJECT;
(C) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MATCHING MONEY
PROVIDED BY THE APPLICANT FOR EACH PROJECT AND, WHERE
APPLICABLE, THE AMOUNT OF MATCHING MONEY COMMITTED TO BE
PROVIDED BY THE APPLICANT BUT NOT YET PROVIDED FOR EACH PROJECT;
AND
(D) A SUMMARY OF THE REASONS OF THE BOARD FOR PROVIDING
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PROJECT; AND
(IV) A LIST OF THE WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS FOR WHICH
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE HAS BEEN PROVIDED DURING THE PRIOR FISCAL
YEAR, WHICH MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF EACH PROJECT;
(B) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED FOR EACH PROJECT; AND
(C) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MATCHING MONEY
PROVIDED BY THE APPLICANT FOR EACH PROJECT.
(b) A LIST OF THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE APPLICATIONS FOR
WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS THAT WERE DENIED FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE DURING THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR AND THAT INCLUDES FOR
EACH PROJECT:
(I) A BRIEF PROJECT DESCRIPTION;
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE REQUESTED FOR THE PROJECT; AND
(III) A SUMMARY OF THE REASONS WHY THE BOARD DENIED
-46- SB26-139

FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PROJECT; AND
(c) AN ESTIMATE, TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, OF THE TOTAL
AMOUNTS OF REVENUES TO BE CREDITED TO THE FUND DURING THE
CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AND THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR AND FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO BE AWARDED DURING THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING
SEPARATE ESTIMATES OF THE TOTAL AMOUNTS OF FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
TO BE AWARDED AS CASH GRANTS AND UNDER THE TERMS OF A FINANCED
PURCHASE OF AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-43.8-108 (2).
(2) THE BOARD SHALL PREPARE AND MAKE AVAILABLE
ELECTRONICALLY ON THE WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT A REPORT TO THE
TAXPAYERS OF THE STATE REGARDING THE PROVISION OF FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO APPLICANTS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8 DURING THE
FIVE PRIOR FISCAL YEARS. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM,
THE INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION FOR
EACH OF THE FIVE PRIOR FISCAL YEARS AND AN AGGREGATION OF ANY OF
SUCH INFORMATION THAT CAN FEASIBLY BE AGGREGATED FOR THE FULL
FIVE-YEAR PERIOD.
22-43.8-110. Attorney general as legal advisor.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ACT AS LEGAL ADVISOR FOR THE
BOARD, AND WITH THE CONSENT OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE BOARD
MAY EMPLOY ADDITIONAL LEGAL COUNSEL.
22-43.8-111. Tax increases not required.
NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 43.8 SHALL BE DEEMED TO REQUIRE A
SCHOOL DISTRICT TO INCREASE TAXES.
22-43.8-112. Open records and open meetings.
IN EXERCISING THEIR POWERS AND DUTIES PURSUANT TO THIS
-47- SB26-139

ARTICLE 43.8, THE BOARD AND THE DIVISION OF HOUSING AND DIVISION OF
PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE ARE SUBJECT TO THE
OPEN MEETINGS PROVISIONS OF THE "COLORADO SUNSHINE ACT OF 1972",
PART 4 OF ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 24, AND THE "COLORADO OPEN RECORDS
ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
22-43.8-113. Prioritization and selections of tenants.
APPLICANTS SHALL ESTABLISH THEIR OWN POLICIES CONCERNING
THE PRIORITIZATION AND SELECTION OF TENANTS IN WORKFORCE
HOUSING, THE FINANCING OF WHICH IS APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 43.8 AND SHALL ENSURE THAT THOSE POLICIES COMPLY WITH
COLORADO AND FEDERAL FAIR HOUSING LAWS.
22-43.8-114. Workforce housing rental income.
AN APPLICANT THAT OBTAINS FINANCING FOR WORKFORCE
HOUSING PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8 IS ENTITLED TO ALL RENTAL
INCOME GENERATED BY THE WORKFORCE HOUSING.
22-43.8-115. Relationship of applicants and other
jurisdictions.
(1) THE PROVISION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING BY AN APPLICANT IS
A MATTER OF STATEWIDE CONCERN AND THEREFORE EACH COUNTY,
MUNICIPALITY, OR SPECIAL DISTRICT IN WHICH A WORKFORCE HOUSING
PROJECT IS LOCATED, IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT, SHALL PROVIDE
GOVERNMENTAL SERVICES OF THE SAME CHARACTER AND TO THE SAME
EXTENT AS SERVICES PROVIDED FOR OTHER RESIDENTS OF THE COUNTY,
MUNICIPALITY, OR SPECIAL DISTRICT.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICANT MAY ENTER INTO CONTRACTUAL OR
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENTS WITH ANY COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY,
-48- SB26-139

OR SPECIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PROVISION OF ANY ADDITIONAL
COMMUNITY, MUNICIPAL, OR PUBLIC FACILITIES OR SERVICES NECESSARY
OR DESIRABLE FOR ANY WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
STATE, ANY STATE AGENCY, ANY COUNTY, AND ANY MUNICIPALITY IN
WHICH A WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECT IS OR IS TO BE LOCATED, AND ANY
BOARD, AUTHORITY, AGENCY, DEPARTMENT, COMMISSION, PUBLIC
CORPORATION, OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF SUCH COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY,
HAS THE POWER TO LEND OR GRANT MONEY OR ANY OTHER FORM OF
PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED, TO THE APPLICANT AND TO ENTER
INTO CONTRACTS TO MAKE SUCH LOANS AND GRANTS, ALL UPON WHICH
SUCH TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS THE APPLICANT AND THE STATE, STATE
AGENCY, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY MAY AGREE.
22-43.8-116. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights
of obligees.
THE STATE PLEDGES AND AGREES WITH THE HOLDERS OF ANY
CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION, BOND, OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
ISSUED OR ENTERED INTO BY THE STATE TREASURER, THE BOARD, A
TRUSTEE, AN APPLICANT, OR AN ENTERPRISE OF AN APPLICANT AND ANY
PERSON WHO ENTERS INTO A CONTRACT WITH ANY OF THOSE PERSONS OR
ENTITIES IN RELATION TO WORKFORCE HOUSING THAT THE STATE WILL NOT
IMPAIR THE RIGHTS OF ANY SUCH PERSON WITH RESPECT TO ANY SUCH
CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION, BOND, OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION,
OR CONTRACT. THE STATE FURTHER PLEDGES AND AGREES THAT IT WILL
NOT IMPAIR THE RIGHTS OR REMEDIES OF THE HOLDERS OF ANY
CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION, BOND, OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
ENTERED INTO BY THE STATE TREASURER, THE BOARD, A TRUSTEE, AN
-49- SB26-139

APPLICANT, OR AN ENTERPRISE OF AN APPLICANT IN CONNECTION WITH
WORKFORCE HOUSING OR IMPAIR THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF ANY
PERSON WHO ENTERS INTO A CONTRACT WITH ANY OF THOSE PERSONS OR
ENTITIES IN RELATION TO WORKFORCE HOUSING UNLESS AND UNTIL THE
CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION, BONDS, OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS,
AND OBLIGATIONS UNDER SUCH CONTRACTS HAVE BEEN PAID OR UNTIL
ADEQUATE PROVISIONS FOR PAYMENT HAVE BEEN MADE. THE STATE
TREASURER, A TRUSTEE, AN APPLICANT, AND AN ENTERPRISE OF AN
APPLICANT MAY INCLUDE THIS PROVISION AND UNDERTAKING FOR THE
STATE IN ALL SUCH CERTIFICATES OF PARTICIPATION, BONDS, FINANCIAL
OBLIGATIONS, OR CONTRACTS ISSUED OR ENTERED INTO IN RELATION TO
WORKFORCE HOUSING.
22-43.8-117. Authority of applicants and other local
governments.
(1) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 43.8 SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER
THE AUTHORITY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN APPLYING AND ENFORCING
APPLICABLE INCLUSIONARY ZONING ORDINANCES, DEED RESTRICTIONS,
COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENTS, DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS, OR
OTHER AFFORDABLE HOUSING POLICIES AND STANDARDS.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 43.8 LIMITS THE AUTHORITY OF AN
APPLICANT TO PARTICIPATE IN AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROGRAMS OR
FINANCING MECHANISMS, INCLUDING THE LOW-INCOME HOUSING TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM OR PRIVATE ACTIVITY BOND FINANCING, IN CONNECTION
WITH WORKFORCE HOUSING PROJECTS THAT DO NOT RECEIVE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 43.8.
22-43.8-118. No action maintainable.
ANY LEGAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING TO REVIEW ANY ACTS
-50- SB26-139

OR PROCEEDINGS BY THE STATE TREASURER, THE BOARD, A TRUSTEE, AN
APPLICANT, AN ENTERPRISE OF AN APPLICANT, OR ANY OTHER PERSON IN
RELATION TO WORKFORCE HOUSING, WHETHER BASED UPON
IRREGULARITIES OR JURISDICTIONAL DEFECTS, SHALL NOT BE MAINTAINED
UNLESS COMMENCED WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE PERFORMANCE OF
THE ACT OR PROCEEDINGS OR THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ACTS OR
PROCEEDINGS, WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST, AND IS THEREAFTER
PERPETUALLY BARRED.
22-43.8-119. Judicial examination of powers, acts,
proceedings, or contracts of an applicant.
IN ITS DISCRETION, THE STATE TREASURER, THE BOARD, A TRUSTEE,
AN APPLICANT OR AN ENTERPRISE OF AN APPLICANT MAY FILE A PETITION
AT ANY TIME IN A DISTRICT COURT IN THE STATE SEEKING A JUDICIAL
EXAMINATION AND DETERMINATION OF ANY POWER CONFERRED TO ANY
OF THOSE PERSONS OR ENTITIES BY THIS SENATE BILL , ANY POWER
EXERCISED OR THAT MAY BE EXERCISED BY ANY OF THOSE PERSONS OR
ENTITIES, OR ANY ACT, PROCEEDING OBLIGATION, OR CONTRACT OF ANY
OF THOSE PERSONS OR ENTITIES, WHETHER OR NOT THE ACT OR
PROCEEDING HAS OCCURRED OR THE CONTRACT HAS BEEN EXECUTED. THE
JUDICIAL EXAMINATION AND DETERMINATION MUST BE CONDUCTED IN
SUBSTANTIALLY THE MANNER SET FORTH IN SECTION 32-4-540; EXCEPT
THAT THE NOTICE REQUIRED MUST BE PUBLISHED ONCE A WEEK FOR THREE
CONSECUTIVE WEEKS AND THE HEARING MUST BE HELD NOT LESS THAN
THIRTY DAYS NOR MORE THAN FORTY DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE
PETITION.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-41-101.5 as
follows:
-51- SB26-139

22-41-101.5. Public school fund income stabilization account
- definitions.
(1) THERE IS CREATED WITHIN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND INCOME STABILIZATION ACCOUNT. THE ACCOUNT
CONSISTS OF MONEY CREDITED TO THE ACCOUNT PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE ACCOUNT.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
ACCOUNT TO THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE
ACCOUNT.
(3) FOR ANY STATE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH, AFTER CREDITING
MONEY FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102
(3) FOR THAT STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF INTEREST AND INCOME
REMAINING IN THE FUND, CALCULATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102
(3)(l)(II), EXCEEDS FORTY MILLION DOLLARS, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL CREDIT FROM THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS
NOT THE ACCOUNT TO THE ACCOUNT AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THAT EXCESS.
(4) MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT SHALL ONLY BE APPROPRIATED OR
TRANSFERRED:
(a) IN THE MANNER AND FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN SECTION
22-41-102 (3)(k), IN A FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THERE IS NOT OTHERWISE
SUFFICIENT MONEY IN THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS
NOT THE ACCOUNT TO APPROPRIATE OR CREDIT THE AMOUNT REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(k)(I) AND AT LEAST FORTY-ONE
MILLION DOLLARS PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(k)(II), AND IN AN
AMOUNT NECESSARY TO APPROPRIATE OR CREDIT THE AMOUNT REQUIRED
-52- SB26-139

PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(k)(I) AND AT LEAST FORTY-ONE
MILLION DOLLARS PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(k)(II);
(b) IN THE MANNER AND FOR THE PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN SECTION
22-41-102 (3)(l), IN A FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THERE IS NOT OTHERWISE
SUFFICIENT MONEY IN THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS
NOT THE ACCOUNT TO CREDIT FORTY MILLION DOLLARS TO THE STATE
PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-54-114 PURSUANT TO
SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(l), AND IN AN AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ENSURE
THAT FORTY MILLIONS DOLLARS IS CREDITED TO THE STATE PUBLIC
SCHOOL FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-54-114 PURSUANT TO SECTION
22-41-102 (3)(l) FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND; OR
(c) TO RESTORE ANY LOSS TO THE PRINCIPAL OF THE PORTION OF
THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE ACCOUNT RESULTING FROM AN
AGGREGATE LOSS OF PRINCIPAL AS DEFINED IN SECTION 22-41-104 (2).
(5) (a) MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT IS NOT THE PRINCIPAL OF THE
PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE ACCOUNT AND
THE USE OF THE MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT NEED NOT COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 22-41-102, BUT IS OTHERWISE CONSIDERED TO
BE A PART OF THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE
ACCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 41.
(b) MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT MUST BE INVESTED IN THE SAME
MANNER AS THE PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE
ACCOUNT.
(c) MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT IS CONSIDERED TO BE IN THE PORTION
OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND THAT IS NOT THE ACCOUNT FOR PURPOSES OF
DETERMINING THE AMOUNTS TO BE CREDITED OR APPROPRIATED FROM THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3).
-53- SB26-139

(6) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "ACCOUNT" MEANS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND INCOME
STABILIZATION ACCOUNT CREATED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-41-102, add (3)(l)
as follows:
22-41-102. Fund inviolate - definition.
(3) (l) (I) ON NOVEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, AFTER MONEY IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND HAS BEEN
APPROPRIATED AND CREDITED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(k) OF THIS
SECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE
LESSER OF INTEREST AND INCOME REMAINING IN THE FUND UP TO A TOTAL
OF TWO AND ONE-HALF PERCENT OF TOTAL FUND VALUE AS MEASURED
BEFORE ANY MONEY WAS CREDITED OR APPROPRIATED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR OR
FORTY MILLION DOLLARS IS CREDITED TO THE STATE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 22-54-114; AND
(II) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(l), THE AMOUNT OF INTEREST
AND INCOME REMAINING IN THE FUND IS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
(A) INTEREST AND INCOME THAT INCLUDES REVENUE EARNED, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL REPORTING
STANDARDS OF THE GOVERNMENTAL ACCOUNTING STANDARDS BOARD
FOR INVESTMENTS HELD BY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, FROM EXTERNAL
INVESTMENT POOLS, INTEREST, DIVIDENDS, AND NET CHANGES IN THE FAIR
MARKET VALUE OF INVESTMENTS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE INVESTMENT OF
THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND PRINCIPAL, WHETHER THOSE NET CHANGES ARE
RECEIVED IN CASH; AND
(B) INTEREST AND INCOME THAT DOES NOT INCLUDE REVENUE
-54- SB26-139

EARNED FROM EXTERNAL INVESTMENT POOLS, INTEREST, DIVIDENDS, AND
NET CHANGES IN THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF INVESTMENTS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE INVESTMENT OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND
PRINCIPAL, WHETHER THOSE NET CHANGES ARE RECEIVED IN CASH.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-41-105, add (3)
as follows:
22-41-105. Income distinguished from principal.
(3) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
REPORTING STANDARDS OF THE GOVERNMENTAL ACCOUNTING STANDARDS
BOARD FOR INVESTMENTS HELD BY GOVERNMENTAL EXTERNAL
INVESTMENT POOLS, INTEREST, DIVIDENDS, AND NET CHANGES IN THE FAIR
MARKET VALUE OF INVESTMENTS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE INVESTMENT OF
THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND PRINCIPAL, WHETHER OR NOT THOSE NET
CHANGES ARE RECEIVED IN CASH ARE INCOME AND ARE NOT PART OF THE
PRINCIPAL OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-55-103, amend
with relocated provisions (7) as follows:
22-55-103. State education fund - creation - transfers to fund
- use of money in fund - permitted investments - exempt from
spending limitations - kids matter account - definition - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(7) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT, FOR
THE PURPOSES OF SECTION 17 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION,
THE FUNDING AND PROVIDING OF WORKFORCE HOUSING IS A PROGRAM FOR
ACCOUNTABLE PROGRAMS TO MEET STATE ACADEMIC STANDARDS, FOR
CLASS SIZE REDUCTION, AND FOR EXPANDING THE AVAILABILITY OF
PRESCHOOL AND KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS AND MAY THEREFORE
-55- SB26-139

RECEIVE MONEY FROM THE STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION
17 (4) OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(b) ON NOVEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FROM THE STATE EDUCATION
FUND TO THE WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 22-43.8-104 AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT CREDITED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-41-102 (3)(l) FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-22-107, add (8)
as follows:
24-22-107. Duties and powers of state treasurer.
(8) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ENTER INTO
CONTRACTS WITH PUBLIC ENTITIES AND PRIVATE PARTIES, INCLUDING
PUBLIC-PUBLIC AND PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS, FOR THE
ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, IMPROVEMENT, OWNERSHIP, OPERATION,
LEASING, AND LEASE-PURCHASING OF WORKFORCE HOUSING, AS DEFINED
SECTION 22-43.8-103 (15).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-705, add
(1)(y) as follows:
24-32-705. Functions of division.
(1) The division has the following functions:
(y) TO PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT AS
DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE 43.8 OF TITLE 22 OR AS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO
THE WORKFORCE HOUSING ASSISTANCE BOARD CREATED IN SECTION
22-43.8-105, IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL
CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION.
-56- SB26-139

SECTION 11. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-57- SB26-139